District of Columbia statutes.
50-2703

Vehicle reclamation period.

A vehicle that is towed and stored pursuant to this chapter shall be reclaimed within 28 days after the date of the notice sent pursuant to § 50-2702(a); except, that if the address of either the owner or the lienholders is unknown, the vehicle shall be reclaimed within 14 days after the publication date of reclamation notices under § 50-2702(b).

History

June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 4, 53 DCR 3682

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2705.